src/fst/stems/determiners.lexc
!! # Faroese deternminers

LEXICON Determiner
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
ein+Det:ei       detcas ;
mín+Det+Poss:mí  poss ;
tín+Det+Poss:tí  poss ;
sín+Det+Poss:sí  poss ;
vár+Det+Pos:vár  vaar1plposs ;

tann+Det+Msc: TANNM ;
tann+Det+Fem: TANNF ;
tann+Pron+Dem+Msc: TANNM ;
tann+Pron+Dem+Fem: TANNF ;

tað+Pron+Dem+Neu:  TAD   ;
tað+Det+Neu:  TAD   ; ! XXX check

eingin+Det: EINGINd ;

hesin+Det:he HESIN ;
hesin+Pron+Dem:he HESIN ;

hasin+Det:ha HESIN ;
hasin+Pron+Dem:ha HESIN ;

hin+Det: HIN ;
hin+Pron+Dem: HIN ;

allur+Det:all a_non_umlaut ;
allur+Det:all%^UUML a_umlaut ;
allur+Det:all adj_def ;

summur+Det:summ summ ;
summur+Det:summ posspl ;

einhvør+Det: EINHVOR ;

LEXICON summ ! XXX check
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+Msc+Sg+Nom:%>ur # ;
+Msc+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>um # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>s # ;

+Fem+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>a # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>i # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>ari # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>ar # ;

+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>t # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>t # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>um # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>s # ;




LEXICON detcas
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+Msc+Sg+Nom:n # ;
+Msc+Sg+Acc:n # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:n%>um # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen:n%>s # ;

+Fem+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc:n%>a # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:n%>i # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:n%>ari # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen:n%>ar # ;

+Neu+Sg+Nom:t # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:t # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom:tt # ; ! Num, but also Det
+Neu+Sg+Acc:tt # ; ! Num, but also Det
+Neu+Sg+Dat:n%>um # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen:n%>s # ;
			 
+Msc+Pl+Nom:n%>ir # ;
+Msc+Pl+Acc:n%>ar # ;
+Msc+Pl+Dat:n%>um # ;
+Msc+Pl+Gen:n%>a # ;
			 
+Fem+Pl+Nom: # ;
+Fem+Pl+Acc:n%>ar # ;
+Fem+Pl+Dat:n%>ar # ;
+Fem+Pl+Dat:n%>um # ;
+Fem+Pl+Gen:n%>a # ;
			 
+Neu+Pl+Nom:n%>i # ;
+Neu+Pl+Acc:n%>i # ;
+Neu+Pl+Dat:n%>um # ;
+Neu+Pl+Gen:n%>a # ;

LEXICON poss 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 posssg ;
 :n posspl ;
 
LEXICON posssg
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+Msc+Sg+Nom:n # ;
+Msc+Sg+Acc:n # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:n%>um # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen:n%>s # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom:n  # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc:n%>a # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:n%>ar # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:n%>ari # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen:n%>ar # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>tt # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>tt # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:n%>um # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen:n%>s # ;

LEXICON posspl
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+Msc+Pl+Nom:%>ir # ;
+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>ar # ;
+Msc+Pl+Dat:%>um # ;
+Msc+Pl+Gen:%>a # ;
+Fem+Pl+Nom:%>ar # ;
+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>ar # ;
+Fem+Pl+Dat:%>um # ;
+Fem+Pl+Gen:%>a # ;
+Neu+Pl+Nom:%>i # ;
+Neu+Pl+Acc:%>i # ;
+Neu+Pl+Dat:%>um # ;
+Neu+Pl+Gen:%>a # ;

LEXICON vaar1plposs
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+Msc+Sg+Nom: # ;
!+Msc+Sg+Acc: # ;
!+Msc+Sg+Dat: # ;
!+Msc+Sg+Gen: # ;
!+Fem+Sg+Nom: # ;
!+Fem+Sg+Acc: # ;
!+Fem+Sg+Dat: # ;
!+Fem+Sg+Dat: # ;
!+Fem+Sg+Gen: # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom:t # ;
!+Neu+Sg+Acc: # ;
!+Neu+Sg+Dat: # ;
!+Neu+Sg+Gen: # ;
!
+Msc+Pl+Nom:ir # ;
!+Msc+Pl+Acc: # ;
!+Msc+Pl+Dat: # ;
!+Msc+Pl+Gen: # ;
+Fem+Pl+Nom:ar # ;
!+Fem+Pl+Acc: # ;
!+Fem+Pl+Dat: # ;
!+Fem+Pl+Gen: # ;
!+Neu+Pl+Nom: # ;
!+Neu+Pl+Acc: # ;
!+Neu+Pl+Dat: # ;
!+Neu+Pl+Gen: # ;


LEXICON TANNM
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+Sg+Nom:tann # ;
+Sg+Acc:tann # ;
+Sg+Dat:tí # ;
+Sg+Dat:tann # ;
+Sg+Gen:tess # ;
+Pl+Nom:teir # ;
+Pl+Acc:teir # ;
+Pl+Acc:tá # ;
+Pl+Dat:teim # ; ! XXX
+Pl+Dat:teimum # ;
+Pl+Gen:teirra # ;

LEXICON TANNF
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+Sg+Nom:tann # ;
+Sg+Acc:ta # ;
+Sg+Acc:tí # ;
+Sg+Dat:tí # ;
+Sg+Dat:teirri # ;
+Sg+Gen:teirrar # ;
+Pl+Nom:tær # ;
+Pl+Acc:tær # ;
+Pl+Dat:teim # ; ! XXX
+Pl+Dat:teimum # ;
+Pl+Gen:teirra # ;

LEXICON TAD
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+Sg+Nom:tað # ;
+Sg+Acc:tað # ;
+Sg+Dat:tí # ;
+Sg+Gen:tess # ;
+Pl+Nom:tey # ;
+Pl+Acc:tey # ;
+Pl+Dat:teim # ; ! XXX
+Pl+Dat:teimum # ;
+Pl+Gen:teirra # ;

LEXICON HESIN
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+Msc+Sg+Nom:sin # ;
+Msc+Sg+Acc:nda # ;
+Msc+Sg+Acc:ndan # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:sum # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom:nda # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom:ndan # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc:sa # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:si # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:sari # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom:tta # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom:ttar # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:tta # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:ttar # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:sum # ;
+Msc+Pl+Nom:sir # ;
+Msc+Pl+Acc:sar # ;
+Msc+Pl+Dat:sum # ;
+Msc+Pl+Gen:sa # ;
+Fem+Pl+Nom:sar # ;
+Fem+Pl+Acc:sar # ;
+Fem+Pl+Dat:sum # ;
+Fem+Pl+Gen:sa # ;
+Neu+Pl+Nom:si # ;
+Neu+Pl+Acc:si # ;
+Neu+Pl+Dat:sum # ;
+Neu+Pl+Gen:sa # ;

LEXICON HIN
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+Msc+Sg+Nom:hin # ;
+Msc+Sg+Acc:hin # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:hinum # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen:hins # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom:hin # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc:hina # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:hini # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:hinari # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen:hins # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom:hitt # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:hitt # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:hinum # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen:hins # ;
+Msc+Pl+Nom:hinir # ;
+Msc+Pl+Acc:hinar # ;
+Msc+Pl+Dat:hinum # ;
+Msc+Pl+Gen:hinna # ;
+Fem+Pl+Nom:hinar # ;
+Fem+Pl+Acc:hinar # ;
+Fem+Pl+Dat:hinum # ;
+Fem+Pl+Gen:hinna # ;
+Neu+Pl+Nom:hini # ;
+Neu+Pl+Acc:hini # ;
+Neu+Pl+Dat:hinum # ;
+Neu+Pl+Gen:hinna # ;

LEXICON EINGINd ! XXX check this lexicon
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+Msc+Sg+Nom:eingin # ;
+Msc+Sg+Acc:ongan # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:ongum # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen:einkis # ;

+Fem+Sg+Nom:eingin # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc:onga # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:eingini # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:ongari # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen:einkis # ;

+Neu+Sg+Nom:einki # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:einki # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:ongum # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen:einkis # ;

+Neu+Sg+Nom:eingir # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:ongar # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:ongum # ;
!+Neu+Sg+Gen:onga # ;

+Fem+Pl+Nom:ongar # ;
+Fem+Pl+Acc:ongar # ;
+Fem+Pl+Dat:ongum # ;
!+Fem+Pl+Gen:onga # ;

+Neu+Pl+Nom:eingi # ;
+Neu+Pl+Acc:eingi # ;
+Neu+Pl+Dat:ongum # ;
!+Neu+Pl+Gen:onga # ;

LEXICON EINHVOR ! TODO correct
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:einhvør # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:eitthvørt # ;
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:einhvørjir # ;
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:einirhvørjir # ;
+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:einhvørjar # ;
+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:einarhvørjar # ;
+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:einhvørji # ;
+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:einihvørji # ;
